Utah statutes.
11-17-16.1.   Agreements authorized by resolution.

(1)  The governing body of any municipality, county, special service district, or state university entering into an agreement pursuant to Section 11-17-3 may provide for the publication of any resolution adopted by it authorizing the execution of the agreement, in a newspaper qualified to carry notices having general circulation therein.

(2)  Any agreement authorized to be executed by the resolution may be attached as an exhibit to the resolution and need not be published as part of the resolution if the resolution provides that a copy of the agreement may be examined at an office of the municipality, county, special service district, or state university during regular business hours as described in the resolution and for a period of at least 30 days after the publication of the resolution.

(3)  For a period of 30 days after publication of the resolution, any person in interest may contest the legality of the resolution, any agreement authorized thereby, or any provisions made for the security and payment of the obligations of the municipality, county, special service district, or state university under the agreement.  After the expiration of the 30-day period no person has any cause of action to contest the regularity, formality, or legality of the resolution or any agreement authorized thereby for any cause.



Amended by Chapter 92, 1987 General Session

